Hawaii statutes.
§444-12 Application; fees. (a) Every
applicant for a license under this chapter shall complete and file an
application provided by the board and shall furnish any additional information
bearing upon the issuance of the license as the board shall require. In the
case of a partnership, joint venture, or corporation, any partner, member, or
officer thereof may sign the application on behalf of the applicant.

(b) Every applicant who is required by the
board to be examined shall pay, directly to the testing agency, an examination
fee.

(c) These fees shall be as provided in rules
adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1957, c 305, §1(s 11); am L
1965, c 241, §2; Supp, §166A-11; HRS §444-12; am L 1983, c 201, §3; am L 1985,
c 160, §2; am L 1988, c 109, §1; am L 1992, c 202, §66; am L 1995, c 20, §4; am
L 1997, c 40, §10]

Cross References

Modification of fee, see §92-28.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next